Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.110

Good faith purchasers.

A purchaser in good faith of goods disposed of pursuant to RCW 19.150.080(2) takes the goods free of any rights of persons against whom the lien was claimed, despite noncompliance by the owner of the storage facility with this chapter.

[ 1996 c 220 s 3; 1988 c 240 s 12.]

NOTES:

Application—1996 c 220: See note following RCW 19.150.060.